Arkansas, session 2025, SB309.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 23-99-422(a)(2), concerning the definition
of "psychiatric collaborative care model" under the Arkansas Health Care
Consumer Act, is amended to read as follows:
(2) “Psychiatric collaborative care model” means the delivery of
care that is:
(A) An evidence-based, integrated behavioral health
service delivery method described at 81 Fed. Reg. 80230-80239, as it existed
on March 31, 2023 January 1, 2025, and the MLN Booklet for Behavioral Health
Integration Services published by the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid
Services, as it existed on March 31, 2023 January 1, 2025; and
*ANS299*
02/26/2025 8:23:11 AM ANS299

SB309
(B)(i) A method typically used by a primary care team
consisting of a primary care provider and a care manager who works in
collaboration with a psychiatric consultant, including without limitation a
psychiatrist.
(ii)(a) A primary care team under subdivision
(a)(2)(B)(i) of this section may include an individual providing clinical
psychiatric pharmacist services if the individual:
(1) Possesses a pharmacy degree
from a program accredited by the Accreditation Council for Pharmacy
Education;
(2) Utilizes a protocol of disease
state management as defined under § 17-92-101 with a supervising provider or
provides independent services as a consultant with drug information and
medication therapy expertise; and
(3) Holds his or her pharmacist
license in good standing with the Arkansas State Board of Pharmacy.
(b) An individual providing clinical
psychiatric pharmacist services may hold a national board certification.


















02/26/2025 8:23:11 AM ANS299